Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
451J

LICENSED MARRIAGE
AND FAMILY THERAPISTS

Section

451J-1 Definitions

451J-2 Marriage and family therapist licensing
program

451J-3 Powers and duties of the director

451J-4 Fees; disposition

451J-5 Prohibited acts

451J-6 Exemptions

451J-7 Application for licensure

451J-7.5 Reciprocity

451J-8 Examination

451J-9 Licensure fees

451J-10 Renewal of license

451J-11 Denial, revocation, or suspension of
license

451J-12 Confidentiality and privileged
communications

451J-13 Therapist prohibited from testifying in
alimony and

divorce actions

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2016, c 29, §4.

Cross References

Marriage and family therapists, appointment as child custody
evaluators, see §571-46.4.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next